Utah statutes.
72-7-501.   Purpose of part -- Utah-Federal Agreements ratified.

(1)  The purpose of this part is to provide the statutory basis for the regulation of outdoor advertising consistent with zoning principles and standards and the public policy of this state in providing public safety, health, welfare, convenience and enjoyment of public travel, to protect the public investment in highways, to preserve the natural scenic beauty of lands bordering on highways, and to ensure that outdoor advertising shall be continued as a standardized medium of communication throughout the state so that it is preserved and can continue to provide general information in the specific interest of the traveling public safely and effectively.

(2)  It is the purpose of this part to provide a statutory basis for the reasonable regulation of outdoor advertising consistent with the customary use, zoning principles and standards, the protection of private property rights, and the public policy relating to areas adjacent to the interstate, federal aid primary highway existing as of June 1, 1991, and the national highway systems highways.

(3)  The agreement entered into between the governor of the state of Utah and the Secretary of Transportation of the United States dated January 18, 1968, regarding the size, lighting, and spacing of outdoor advertising which may be erected and maintained within areas adjacent to the interstate, federal aid primary highway existing as of June 1, 1991, and national highway systems highways which are zoned commercial or industrial or in other unzoned commercial or industrial areas as defined pursuant to the terms of the agreement is hereby ratified and approved, subject to subsequent amendments.

